Utah statutes.
38-1-37.   Application of Section 38-1-27 and Sections 38-1-30 through 38-1-36.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), Section 38-1-27 and Sections 38-1-30 through 38-1-36 in effect as of May 1, 2005 shall apply to construction projects for which a notice of commencement is filed on or after May 1, 2005.

(2)  A construction project for which a notice of commencement is filed before May 1, 2005 is subject to the provisions of this chapter in effect prior to May 1, 2005.

(3) (a)  Section 38-1-27 and Sections 38-1-30 through 38-1-36 in effect as of May 1, 2005, shall apply to a construction project for which a notice of commencement is filed on or after November 1, 2005 involving a residence, as defined in Subsection 38-11-102(22).

(b)  For a construction project for which a notice of commencement is filed before November 1, 2005 involving a residence, as defined in Subsection 38-11-102(22), the law in effect on April 30, 2005 shall govern.

